District of Columbia statutes.
38-651.10

Misuse.

(a)

A school may deny a medication action plan pursuant to terms established by the Mayor.

(b)

A student who self-administers medication while at school, at a school-sponsored activity, or while on school-sponsored transportation for a purpose other than his or her own treatment may be subject to disciplinary action by the school; provided, that disciplinary action shall not limit or restrict the access of a student to his or her prescribed medication. The school shall promptly notify the responsible person of any disciplinary action imposed.

Feb. 2, 2008, D.C. Law 17-107, § 11, 54 DCR 12230
Section 7 of Law 17-52 added a section to read as follows:
“Sec. 7. Misuse.
“A student who self-administers medication while at school, at a school-sponsored activity, or while on school-sponsored transportation for a purpose other than his or her own authorized treatment may be subject to disciplinary action by the school; provided, that disciplinary action shall not limit or restrict the access of a student to his or her prescribed medication. The school shall promptly notify the responsible person of any disciplinary action imposed.”
Section 11(b) of D.C. Law 17-52 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 7 of Student Access to Treatment Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-82, July 26, 2007, 54 DCR 7999).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 7 of Student Access to Treatment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-140, October 17, 2007, 54 DCR 10736).